California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(4) The auditor may investigate any material claim of financial fraud, waste, or impropriety within the consolidated agency and for that purpose may summon any officer, agent, or employee of the consolidated agency, any claimant, or other person, and examine the person upon oath or affirmation relative thereto. All consolidated agency contracts with consultants, vendors, or agencies will be prepared with an adequate audit provision to allow the auditor access to the entity’s records needed to verify compliance with the terms specified in the contract. Results of all audits and reports shall be made available to the public in accordance with the requirements of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000)
 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) The board shall develop and adopt internal control guidelines to prevent and detect financial errors and fraud based on the internal control guidelines developed by the Controller pursuant to Section 12422.5 of the Government Code and the standards adopted by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

(d) The board shall develop and adopt an administration policy that includes a process to conduct staff performance evaluations on a regular basis to determine if the knowledge, skills, and abilities of staff members are sufficient to perform their respective functions, and shall monitor the evaluation process on a regular basis.

(e) The board members shall make an annual
 report to their member agencies at a public meeting pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, that includes a summary of activities by the consolidated agency including, but not limited to, program developments, project updates, changes to voter-approved expenditure plans, and potential ballot measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 407.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.2.

This chapter is necessary for the public health, safety, and welfare, and shall be liberally construed to carry out the objects and purposes of this chapter and the declared policy of the state as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the federal government, the state, and local agencies within the jurisdictional area of the consolidated agency will participate in support of the consolidated agency. It is further the intent of the Legislature that financial support for the activities of the consolidated agency will be made available from federal, state, and local sources normally available for transportation and other planning purposes in the region and for those functions consolidated within the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.4.

The consolidated agency shall be excluded from the requirements of a “local agency” set forth in Section 53091 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.5.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes the consolidated agency to operate public transit systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.6.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the consolidated agency shall not have any authority over local land use decisions affecting permitting or zoning of public or private development projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.7.

The consolidated agency shall not enter into a construction contract over one million dollars ($1,000,000) with any entity unless the entity provides to the consolidated agency an enforceable commitment that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or a contract that falls within an apprenticeship occupation in the building and construction trades in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(a) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(1) The consolidated agency has entered into a project labor agreement that
 will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or the consolidated agency has contracted to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity has agreed to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(2) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the consolidated agency before January 1, 2017.

(3) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or the entity has contracted to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 16.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.8.

(a) The consolidated agency may implement every component of the regional transportation plan described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, as well as subsequent updates of the regional transportation plan. This implementation authority shall include, but is not limited to, the authority to plan, engineer, design, and seek funding sources for applicable projects.

(b) The implementation authority described in subdivision (a) shall include, but is not limited to, the authority to seek resources and fund projects
 identified in the sustainable communities strategy described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, including habitat conservation projects, water quality improvement projects, and other environmental mitigation projects.

(c) The consolidated agency may exercise its bonding authority pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 132370) to implement any component of the regional transportation plan described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 65080, as well as subsequent updates to the regional transportation
 plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   (AB 2367)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Staffing, Labor, and Retirement Benefits [132355. - 132355.4.]

132355.

Administrative authority for the consolidated agency shall be vested in the office of the executive director, subject to the direction and policies of the consolidated agency as approved by the board. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and may appoint employees as may be necessary to carry out the functions of the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132355.1.

The employees of the consolidated entities affected by this chapter shall become employees of the consolidated agency and shall suffer no loss of employment or reduction in wages, health and welfare and other benefits, seniority, retirement benefits or contributions made to retirement plans, or any other term or condition of employment as a result of the enactment of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132355.2.

(a) Upon succession of the consolidated agency under Section 132351.3, and in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 132353), all affected employees of the consolidated entities shall become employees of the consolidated agency at their existing or substantially equivalent classifications, salaries, and benefits. All consolidated entity employees who become employees of the consolidated agency shall be given sick leave, seniority, and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the consolidated entity that previously employed them.

(b) On the effective date of succession of the consolidated agency:

(1) Regular employees of the consolidated entities shall be deemed qualified, and no other qualifications shall be required for employment or retention by the consolidated agency.

(2) Probationary employees of consolidated entities shall retain their probationary status and rights, and shall not be deemed to have transferred so as to require serving a new probationary period.

(c) Upon transfer of any public benefit corporation owned solely by the MTDB pursuant to Section 132353.3, any reference to the board or to the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board in Article 1 (commencing with Section 120500), Article 2 (commencing with Section 120520), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 120540) of Chapter 5 of Division 11 shall be deemed to refer to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132355.3.

(a) Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system or other benefits established by the consolidated entities shall continue to have comparable rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to the established systems.

(b) The consolidated agency and the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS) shall enter into an agreement to provide comparable benefits to those persons who were employees, retirees, or beneficiaries of the consolidated entities’ pension and retirement plans at the time of consolidation. Any expense related to this agreement between the consolidated agency and PERS, including retiree coverage, shall be borne by the consolidated agency. The agreement shall be effective as of the date of succession by the consolidated agency.

(c) Those retired employees of the consolidated entities, including their eligible dependents, who are (1) retired on the effective date of the succession; or (2) an eligible beneficiary of a retired employee on the effective date of succession, and (3) who were eligible for benefits through PERS as provided and paid for by a consolidated entity, shall continue to be eligible for comparable benefits, including health care insurance, under the terms of the contracts between the consolidated entities and PERS in effect on the day prior to the succession. These benefits shall be provided at no cost to the retired employee or eligible beneficiary, except for normal copayments as otherwise provided for in the terms of the contracts between the consolidated entities and PERS in effect on the day prior to the succession.

(d) Allowances of persons retired from the consolidated entities as of the consolidation date and their beneficiaries and of beneficiaries of deceased members or retired persons who are receiving allowances as of the succession date, shall be continued in at least the amount provided under the contracts between the consolidated entities and PERS in effect on the day prior to the succession. The succession shall not affect the contribution rate of any employee, retiree, or beneficiary or any retirement allowance or other benefit based on service to a consolidated entity being paid on the day prior to succession.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 20511 of the Government Code, time of service by consolidated entity employees shall be credited as services rendered for the consolidated agency for purposes of calculating retirement benefits. The time of service by consolidated entity employees shall create prior service liabilities against the consolidated agency. Service rendered by consolidated entity employees who become employees of the consolidated agency on the date of succession shall be combined with service rendered by the employee as an employee of the consolidated agency for purposes of calculating retirement benefits. The consolidated agency’s contract with PERS shall contain a provision to bring this section into effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132355.4.

(a) Whenever a majority of the employees employed by the consolidated agency in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, and upon determining that the labor organization represents at least a majority of the employees in the appropriate unit, the determination of questions concerning employee representation and the conduct of employee-employer relations for the consolidated agency shall be governed by the Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) For the purposes of the wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, the consolidated agency shall be considered a special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.3. Adoption and Revision of a Regional Aviation Strategic Plan and Airport Multimodal Accessibility Plan [132357. - 132359.]

132357.

On or before June 30, 2008, the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority and the consolidated agency shall enter into an agreement for the coordination of responsibilities for the adoption of, and updates to, the regional aviation strategic plan and the airport multimodal accessibility plan for San Diego County pursuant to this article. The agreement shall include provisions for coordination and timing of the preparation and maintenance of the plans. The agreement shall also provide for coordination of efforts to obtain funding from outside sources and equitable allocation of funding responsibilities for the airport multimodal accessibility plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

132358.

(a) The San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall prepare a regional aviation strategic plan with the objective of identifying workable strategies to improve the performance of the San Diego County regional airport system.

(b) The San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall seek review and comment from the consolidated agency regarding the scope and content of the regional aviation strategic plan and any updates to the plan.

(c) The elements of the regional aviation strategic plan shall include the following:

(1) A forecast of air passenger and air cargo demand in San Diego County.

(2) Identification of the existing capacity of the airports in the county for commercial and general aviation.

(3) Identification of the strategies and facilities required to accommodate additional demand both as it relates to the air transportation system and the ground access system.

(4) A financial strategy that estimates, over the life of the plan, the amount of funding that can be expected and the likely sources for the funding. The financial strategy shall include a program of investments supported by the expected revenues and estimated schedule of their implementation.

(5) Other elements that further the development of the regional aviation strategic plan.

(d) The regional aviation strategic plan shall incorporate the master plans and airport land use compatibility plans for the airports in San Diego County.

(e) During the preparation of the regional aviation strategic plan, the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall take into consideration the interregional aviation plans from the regions bordering San Diego County.

(f) During the preparation of the regional aviation strategic plan, the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall consult with all of the following:

(1) Civilian and military airport operators in San Diego County.

(2) Appropriate state and federal agencies.

(3) Airport operators in regions adjacent to San Diego County.

(4) The cities in San Diego County.

(5) San Diego County.

(6) The consolidated agency.

(7) The public pursuant to subdivision (g).

(g) The San Diego County Regional Airport Authority, in consultation with the consolidated agency, shall undertake and complete a public participation process to aid in the preparation of the regional aviation strategic plan. The public participation process shall employ a procedure that includes a method of addressing and responding to recommendations made by the public.

(h) A draft of the regional aviation strategic plan and its recommendations shall be circulated for review and comment to the consolidated agency, to the civilian and military airport operators in the county, to cities within San Diego County in which an airport is located, and to San Diego County.

(i) The first regional aviation strategic plan shall be adopted by June 30, 2011.

(j) Upon adoption of the regional aviation strategic plan, the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall submit the plan to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

132359.

(a) The consolidated agency shall prepare and adopt a multimodal surface transportation accessibility plan for airports in San Diego County (airport multimodal accessibility plan) by December 31, 2013. The airport multimodal accessibility plan should be updated as necessary for the consolidated agency to comply with Section 132360.2.

(b) The airport multimodal accessibility plan shall be prepared in consultation with the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority, San Diego County, the cities within San Diego County, the transit operators within San Diego County, the Department of Transportation, the civilian and military airport operators within San Diego County, and airport operators in regions adjacent to San Diego County.

(c) The consolidated agency, in consultation with the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority, shall undertake and complete a public participation process to aid in the preparation of the airport multimodal accessibility plan. The public participation process shall employ a procedure that includes a method of addressing and responding to recommendations made by the public.

(d) The elements of the airport multimodal accessibility plan shall include the following:

(1) The identification of multimodal transportation investments that will improve surface transportation access to the airports in San Diego County and to other counties, if appropriate. The investments may include improvements that increase capacity through the construction of new facilities, or modification to existing facilities, and investments in operational improvements that enhance the carrying capacity of existing facilities.

(2) A program of investments and the anticipated schedule for the development of the projects that comprise the program.

(3) A financial element that estimates for the period of the plan the amount of funding that can be expected, the likely revenue sources from which the funding will be derived, and the program of investments supported by the expected revenue. The financial element shall also contain recommendations for allocation of funds. The financial element may recommend the development of specified new sources of revenue, consistent with the policy element and action.

(4) Other elements that further the development of the airport multimodal accessibility plan.

(e) In preparing the airport multimodal accessibility plan, the consolidated agency shall consider the following:

(1) The regional aviation strategic plan prepared by the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority.

(2) The airport master plans of the civilian and military airport operators in the county.

(3) The general plans and their circulation element of the cities within San Diego County and San Diego County.

(4) The transit plans of the transit operators in San Diego County.

(5) The highway system improvement plans and programs of the Department of Transportation.

(6) The intercity passenger rail plans of the California High-Speed Rail Authority.

(7) The interregional aviation and rail plans from the regions bordering San Diego County.

(8) Other pertinent plans.

(f) Not less than six months prior to the adoption of the airport multimodal accessibility plan, the consolidated agency shall circulate for review and comment the draft plan and its proposed recommendations to the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority, the operators of the remaining civilian and military airports in San Diego County, the cities within San Diego County in which an airport is located, San Diego County, the Department of Transportation, representatives of the tenants of the airports, and other interested parties.

(g) Following adoption of the first airport multimodal accessibility plan, the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall submit updated airport land use compatibility plans to the consolidated agency for review prior to adoption of the revised airport land use compatibility plan by the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority. The board of directors of the consolidated agency shall review proposed airport land use compatibility plans and updates to the plans submitted by the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority and make a determination as to their compatibility with the airport multimodal accessibility plan. In the event the consolidated agency finds that the plans are incompatible with the airport multimodal accessibility plan, the consolidated agency shall return the plan to the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority with its findings. The San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall make any necessary modifications to achieve compatibility and resubmit the plan to the consolidated agency for another compatibility review.

(h) The regional aviation strategic plan shall be reviewed not less than every five years and shall be updated, as necessary, to comply with Section 132360.2.

(i) The airport multimodal accessibility plan shall not limit the authority granted to the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority in subdivision (a) of Section 170048.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Adoption and Administration of a Regional Comprehensive Plan [132360. - 132360.6.]

132360.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the consolidated agency complete a public process by June 30, 2004, to prepare and adopt a regional comprehensive plan based on the local general and regional plans that integrates land uses, transportation systems, infrastructure needs, and public investment strategies, within a regional framework, in cooperation with member agencies and the public.

(b) The regional comprehensive plan should be updated as necessary for the consolidated agency to comply with Section 132360.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 508, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132360.1.

In preparing and updating the regional comprehensive plan, it is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a) The regional comprehensive plan preserve and improve the quality of life in the San Diego region, maximize mobility and transportation choices, and conserve and protect natural resources.

(b) The regional comprehensive plan shall address the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets set by the State Air Resources Board as required by Section 65080 of the Government Code and include strategies that provide for mode shift to public transportation.

(c) The regional comprehensive plan shall identify disadvantaged
 communities as designated pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code and include transportation strategies to reduce pollution exposure in these communities.

(d) In formulating and maintaining the regional comprehensive plan, the consolidated agency shall take account of and shall seek to harmonize the needs of the region as a whole, the plans of the county and cities within the region, and the plans and planning activities of organizations that affect or are concerned with planning and development within the region.

(e) The consolidated agency shall engage in a public collaborative planning process. The recommendations resulting from the public collaborative planning process shall be made available to and considered by the consolidated agency for integration into the draft regional comprehensive plan. The consolidated agency shall adopt a procedure to carry out this
 process including a method of addressing and responding to recommendations from the public.

(f) In formulating and maintaining the regional comprehensive plan, the consolidated agency shall seek the cooperation and consider the recommendations of all of the following:

(1) Its member agencies and other agencies of local government within the jurisdiction of the consolidated agency.

(2) State and federal agencies.

(3) Educational institutions.

(4) Research organizations, whether public or private.

(5) Civic groups.

(6) Private individuals.

(7) Governmental jurisdictions located outside the region but contiguous to its boundaries.

(g) The consolidated agency shall make the regional comprehensive plan, policies, and objectives available to all local agencies and facilitate consideration of the regional comprehensive plan in the development, implementation, and update of local general plans. The consolidated agency shall provide assistance and enhance the opportunities for local agencies to develop, implement, and update general plans in a manner that recognizes, at a minimum, land use, transportation compatibility, and a jobs-to-housing balance within the regional comprehensive plan.

(h) The consolidated agency shall maintain the data, maps, and other information developed in the course of formulating the regional comprehensive plan in a form suitable to
 assure a consistent view of developmental trends and other relevant information for the availability of and use by other government agencies and private organizations.

(i) The components of the regional comprehensive plan may include, but are not limited to, transportation, housing, water quality and supply, infrastructure, air quality, energy, solid waste, economy, and open space, including habitat. Performance standards and measurable criteria shall be established through a public process to ensure that the regional comprehensive plan is prepared consistent with these measures as well as in determining achievement of the regional comprehensive plan goals throughout its implementation.

(j) Any water supply component or provision of the regional infrastructure strategy regarding water supply contained in the regional comprehensive plan shall be consistent with the urban water
 management plan and other adopted regional water facilities and supply plans of the San Diego County Water Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 17.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132360.2.

The regional transportation plan, the regional aviation strategic plan, the airport multimodal accessibility plan, and the regional comprehensive plan should be compatible. The regional comprehensive plan should set the framework for the type of changes upon which subsequent regional transportation plans, regional aviation strategic plans, and airport multimodal accessibility plans should focus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

132360.3.

The consolidated agency shall maintain the data, maps, and other information developed in the course of formulating the regional comprehensive plan in a form suitable to assure a consistent view of developmental trends and other relevant information for the availability of and use by other government agencies and private organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 508, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132360.4.

Each member agency should review the actions that the consolidated agency makes on state and federally regulated or mandated items and report these actions to their respective jurisdiction for review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 508, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132360.5.

All documents created in compliance with this article shall be made available and ready for public review in compliance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 408.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

132360.6.

The consolidated agency may use the authority for the retail transactions and use tax provided under Sections 132301 and 132302 to fund and finance infrastructure needs identified in the regional comprehensive plan developed in accordance with this article. Development of the proposal and expenditure plan shall be conducted using a public collaborative planning process that is consistent with Section 132360.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 83, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Voter Approval [132362. - 132364.]

132362.

(a) In addition to the authority set forth in Article 5 (commencing with Section 132300) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 132320) of Chapter 2 of Division 12.7, if the consolidated agency provides compensation to San Diego County for the cost of including an ordinance or measure on the ballot, the consolidated agency may call an election, including an advisory election, in San Diego County on any ordinance or measure regarding the governance of or matters related to the powers, privileges, or duties of the consolidated agency, including, but not limited to, merger or complete consolidation of the transit boards.

(b) The ordinance or measure shall be consistent with, and shall not be in conflict with, any other
 provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 18.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132364.

The county shall conduct an election, including an advisory election, called by the consolidated agency in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of elections by a county.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 132634 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 271.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Bonds, Equipment, and Leases [132370. - 132372.4.]

132370.

The consolidated agency may issue bonds, payable from revenue of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the consolidated agency, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law are applicable to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.1.

(a) The consolidated agency may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for any one or more transit facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the consolidated agency or for transit equipment described in Section 132372 below authorized to be acquired by the consolidated agency or, in the alternative, the consolidated agency may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any one of those transit facilities or for transit equipment described in Section 132372 below authorized to be acquired by the consolidated agency.

(b) Nothing in this article prohibits the consolidated agency from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this chapter for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the transit facilities authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the consolidated agency may determine.

(c) Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code does not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter and the consolidated agency shall authorize the issuance of such bonds by resolution of its governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.2.

The Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), are applicable to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.3.

Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99000) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code is applicable to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.4.

The consolidated agency shall be considered to be a “local agency” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 53317 of the Government Code and the provisions of Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code are applicable to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.5.

The consolidated agency shall be considered to be a “local agency” as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 6585 of the Government Code and the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code are applicable to the consolidated agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 268.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.6.

The consolidated agency may borrow money in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850), or Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 53859) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 269.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.7.

(a) The consolidated agency may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized to be issued, but which have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any bond application notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes may be paid from any money of the consolidated agency available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the consolidated agency in anticipation of which they were issued. The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the consolidated agency has not been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. The bond anticipation notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the consolidated agency authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.8.

The consolidated agency may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.9.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the consolidated agency under this chapter, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the state, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132370.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the consolidated agency of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability constitute a contract between the consolidated agency and the holders of the bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability, and the provisions thereof are enforceable against the consolidated agency or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Nothing in this article or in any other law shall be held to relieve the consolidated agency or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the consolidated agency. Upon dissolution of the consolidated agency or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, that territory formerly included within the consolidated agency, or withdrawn therefrom, shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of the dissolution or withdrawal as if the consolidated agency had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the successors or assigns to provide for the payment of the bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities.
